Rhode Island statutes. Title 33 Probate Practice and Procedure
Chapter 11 Claims Against Decedents’ Estates

33-11-1.
Computation of time.

Periods of time in this chapter, where no other provision is made, shall be reckoned from the date of the first publication by the probate clerk of the notice of the qualification of the original personal representative of the decedent’s estate.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 881; G.L. 1909, ch. 314, § 1; P.L. 1922, ch. 2196, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 365, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 578, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

33-11-1

; P.L. 2008, ch. 307, § 2.

33-11-2.
Effect of administration de bonis non.

When after qualification the original personal representative dies, resigns or is removed, without having fully administered the estate, and a successor personal representative is appointed, the succeeding administration shall be deemed to be a continuation of the preceding administration, and all limitations which could be claimed for or against the predecessor may be claimed for or against the successor; provided, however, that the time when there is no personal representative of the estate shall not be reckoned as part of the periods for the filing, or proof of claims, or limitations for bringing suits; and these periods, and generally the periods referred to where no provision to the contrary is made, shall be reckoned exclusive of this time.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 974; G.L. 1909, ch. 318, § 9; G.L. 1923, ch. 369, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 579, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

33-11-2

; P.L. 2008, ch. 307, § 2.

33-11-3.
Claims payable at future day.

Claims against the estate of a deceased person, which by their terms are payable at a future day, shall, as against the estate, be deemed to be due at the time of the person’s death, and may be filed, and shall be entitled to payment with other claims, deducting interest for the anticipated payment.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 882; G.L. 1909, ch. 314, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 365, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 578, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

33-11-3

.

33-11-4.
Manner of presentation of claims.

Claims against a decedent’s estate may be presented as follows:

The claimant shall present a written statement of the claim with the clerk of the probate court indicating its basis, the amount claimed (if known), the name and address of the claimant, and the name and address of the claimant’s attorney (if any) and deliver or mail a copy thereof to the personal representative. The claim is deemed presented when filed with the probate court. The claimant has the burden of establishing proper and timely presentation of the claim. If the claim is not yet due, the date when it will become due shall be stated. If the claim is contingent or unliquidated, the nature of the condition or uncertainty shall be stated. If the claim is secured, the security shall be described. Failure to accurately describe the due date of claim not yet due, the nature of any condition or uncertainty, or the security, does not invalidate the presentation made.

No presentation of claim is required for matters already claimed in proceedings which were pending against the decedent at the time of his or her death. No personal representative shall be held to defend and no decedent’s estate shall be held liable for any claim pending against the decedent until the estate shall be joined as a party with notice to the probate court and the personal representative served.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 883; G.L. 1909, ch. 314, § 3; P.L. 1915, ch. 1260, § 3; P.L. 1920, ch. 1937, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 365, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 578, § 3; P.L. 1941, ch. 1003, § 2; P.L. 1951, ch. 2743, § 1; P.L. 1952, ch. 3023, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3717, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

33-11-4

; P.L. 1996, ch. 110, § 5; P.L. 2008, ch. 307, § 2; P.L. 2011, ch. 363, § 6.

33-11-5.
Time allowed for presenting claims — Late claims — Appeal.

Claims shall be presented within six (6) months from the first publication or be forever barred, subject to extensions granted pursuant to subsection

33-11-5(b)

.

A creditor who, by reason of accident, mistake, excusable neglect or lack of adequate notice of decedent’s estate, failed to present a claim within six (6) months from the first publication, may before distribution of the estate, petition the probate court for leave to present a claim out of time. For purposes of this section, notice of commencement of probate pursuant to §

33-11-5.1

at least sixty (60) days before the expiration of the six (6) months claim period shall be deemed adequate. Upon hearing after notice to the decedent’s personal representative, heirs and beneficiaries (if any), the probate court may in its discretion, grant leave to present the claim out of time upon such terms as the court prescribes. Any claim presented out of time, if allowed, shall be paid out of the assets remaining in the personal representative’s hands when notice of the petition was received.

There shall be no de novo appeal to the superior court from an order or decree of the probate court granting leave to present a claim out of time.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 883; G.L. 1909, ch. 314, § 3; P.L. 1915, ch. 1260, § 3; P.L. 1920, ch. 1937, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 365, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 578, § 3; P.L. 1941, ch. 1003, § 2; P.L. 1951, ch. 2743, § 1; P.L. 1952, ch. 3023, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

33-11-5

; P.L. 2008, ch. 307, § 2.

33-11-5.1.
Duty to notify known or reasonably ascertainable creditors.

If the identity of a creditor of the decedent’s is known to or reasonably ascertainable by the personal representative, the personal representative shall, within a reasonable period of time after qualification, take such steps as are reasonably necessary to ensure that such creditor receives or has received notice of the commencement of the decedent’s estate. The sending of a notice in the form contained in subsection (b) by the personal representative to the creditor at his/her or its last known address, by first class mail, postage prepaid, shall be deemed a means, but not the exclusive means, of satisfying the requirements of this section. The personal representative is not liable to a creditor or to a successor personal representative of the decedent for giving or failing to give notice under this section.

A personal representative shall be conclusively presumed to have complied with this section by sending a written notice in substantially the following form:

In all cases where the decedent was fifty-five (55) years or older at the time of death, the personal representatives shall give notice as required by this section to the executive office of health and human services in accordance with §

40-8-15

.

STATE OF RHODE ISLAND PROBATE COURT OF COUNTY OF THE ESTATE OF (NAME OR ESTATE) (NO.) NOTICE OF COMMENCEMENT OF PROBATE To: (Name of Creditor) (last known address of creditor) Notice is hereby given by (name of personal representative) that a probate estate has been commenced for (name of decedent) in the Probate Court of the (name of municipality, address of court) docket no. , said (name of fiduciary) having been qualified on (date of qualification). A creditor must present a written statement of the claim indicating its basis, the amount claimed, the name and address of the claimant, and the name and address of the claimant’s attorney (if any) within six (6) months after qualification. Claims should be mailed to the personal representative or attorney named below and filed with the clerk of the probate court. Name and address of Estate Personal Representative or Attorney Date

Click to view

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 110, § 6; P.L. 2008, ch. 307, § 2; P.L. 2009, ch. 310, § 12; P.L. 2013, ch. 186, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 236, § 1.

33-11-5.2.
Fiduciary’s affidavit regarding notice to creditors and OHHS.

In order to close an estate, whether by accounting or affidavit of completed administration, the fiduciary shall submit to the probate court an affidavit in substantially the following form:

STATE OF RHODE ISLANDPROBATE COURT OF THE COUNTY TOWN OF ESTATE OF NO. FIDUCIARY’S AFFIDAVIT REGARDING NOTICE TO CREDITORS AND TO THE EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES The undersigned fiduciary of the above-captioned estate upon oath deposes and says that (a) notice of the commencement of the estate was mailed to all known or reasonably ascertainable creditors of the estate, as well as to the executive office of health and human services when the decedent was fifty-five (55) years or older, or that (b) no such notice was required to be mailed because the estate had no known or reasonably ascertainable creditors and the decedent was under the age of fifty-five (55). Name Date Subscribed and sworn before me this day of , 20. Notary public

Click to view

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 241, art. 11, § 7.

33-11-6.
Address of creditor filed — Notices.

Every creditor shall file with his or her claim, in the office of the probate clerk, his or her post office address, and shall thereafter give notice to the clerk of any change of his or her address during the administration of the estate. All notices to which the creditor is entitled may be sent to his or her address so filed.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 884; G.L. 1909, ch. 314, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 365, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 578, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

33-11-6

.

33-11-7.
Affidavit to support claim.

If requested by the personal representative or any party interested in decedent’s estate, a claimant shall file in the office of the clerk of the probate court a sworn affidavit stating to the best of the claimant’s knowledge and belief: (a) the legal basis or theory of the claim; (b) the facts and documentation supporting the claim; (c) the calculation of the amount claimed as justly due; (d) whether the estate was credited for all payments and offsets to which it is entitled; (e) whether and how the claim is secured; and (f) whether the claim is upon a negotiable instrument.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 885; G.L. 1909, ch. 314, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 365, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 578, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

33-11-7

; P.L. 2008, ch. 307, § 2.

33-11-8.
Determination of personal representative’s claim.

If a personal representative shall present a claim which he or she had against the decedent in his or her lifetime, the probate court shall examine and determine the claim. If there is a co-executor or co-administrator, he or she may be permitted to represent the estate at the hearing in the discretion of the probate court; otherwise, the probate court may appoint some disinterested person to represent the estate.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 890; G.L. 1909, ch. 314, § 10; G.L. 1923, ch. 365, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 578, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

33-11-8

; P.L. 2008, ch. 307, § 2.

33-11-9.
Presentation of contingent claim — Deposit by personal representative to assure payment.

A creditor who has a contingent claim against a decedent, which cannot be proved as a debt within the time allowed for presenting claims, may present its contingent claim within the time allowed for filing claims. If it is determined by the probate court, upon hearing after notice to all interested parties, that the contingent claim may become due from the estate, the personal representative shall be ordered to deposit in the registry of the court assets sufficient to satisfy the claim, or its proportionate share in case of insolvency of the estate.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 922; G.L. 1909, ch. 314, § 42; G.L. 1923, ch. 365, § 42; G.L. 1938, ch. 578, § 42; G.L. 1956, §

33-11-9

; P.L. 2008, ch. 307, § 2.

33-11-10.
Bond to cover contingent claim.

If a party interested in the estate offers to give bond to the contingent creditor, with sufficient surety or sureties for the payment of the claim in case it shall be proved to be due, the probate court may accept a bond instead of requiring assets to be deposited as provided in §

33-11-9

. But nothing contained in this section shall be construed to prevent any party holding the contingent claim from waiting until its right of action accrues, and then bringing suit against the heirs, devisees, legatees or next of kin, as provided in this chapter.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 923; G.L. 1909, ch. 314, § 43; G.L. 1923, ch. 365, § 43; G.L. 1938, ch. 578, § 43; G.L. 1956, §

33-11-10

; P.L. 2008, ch. 307, § 2.

33-11-11.
Provision for payment of contingent claim not conclusive as to validity — Restrictions on action to enforce claim.

The decision of the probate court as to depositing assets or giving bond upon the contingent claim of a creditor shall not be conclusive as to the validity of the claim against the personal representative or other party interested to oppose the allowance thereof; and the personal representative shall not be compelled to pay the claim, unless it is proved to be due in an action commenced by the claimant within one year after its claim becomes payable. In case of suit against the personal representative, recovery shall be limited to the assets in the registry of the court deposited as provided in §

33-11-9

.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 924; G.L. 1909, ch. 314, § 44; G.L. 1923, ch. 365, § 44; G.L. 1938, ch. 578, § 44; P.L. 1939, ch. 659, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

33-11-11

; P.L. 2008, ch. 307, § 2.

33-11-12.
Party against whom contingent claim enforced — Time of bringing action.

The action referred to in §

33-11-11

shall be brought against the personal representative, if depositing assets therefor in the registry of the court was required, and an action against the personal representative may be brought although the period of two (2) years, referred to in §

33-11-50

, has elapsed; otherwise, the action shall be brought upon the bond given under §

33-11-10

.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 925; G.L. 1909, ch. 314, § 45; G.L. 1923, ch. 365, § 45; P.L. 1926, ch. 839, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 578, § 45; G.L. 1956, §

33-11-12

; P.L. 2008, ch. 307, § 2.

33-11-13.
Pleadings in action on bond for contingent claim.

If the action is brought on a bond, the plaintiff shall set forth his or her original cause of action against the decedent in like manner as would be required upon the same demand against the personal representative, and may allege the nonpayment of the demand as a breach of the condition of the bond; and the defendant may answer any matter of defense that would be available in law against the demand if prosecuted in the usual manner against the personal representative.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 926; G.L. 1909, ch. 314, § 46; G.L. 1923, ch. 365, § 46; G.L. 1938, ch. 578, § 46; G.L. 1956, §

33-11-13

; P.L. 2008, ch. 307, § 2.

33-11-14.
Disallowance of claim.

Any claim presented within six (6) months from the first publication may be disallowed in full or in part, within six (6) months and thirty (30) days from the first publication by the personal representative, or by any interested party, by filing in the office of the clerk of the probate court a statement disallowing the claim, and giving notice in writing, either personally or by registered or certified mail, to the claimant, whose claim is disallowed; and any claim presented after six (6) months from the first publication may be disallowed in full or in part, within thirty (30) days after presentation.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 886; G.L. 1909, ch. 314, § 6; P.L. 1910, ch. 583, § 1; P.L. 1915, ch. 1260, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 365, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 578, § 6; P.L. 1941, ch. 1003, § 3; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3717, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

33-11-14

; P.L. 2005, ch. 389, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 307, § 2.

33-11-15.
Petition for filing of late disallowance.

A personal representative, or any interested party, who has failed to disallow any claim within the time prescribed by §

33-11-14

, may at any time before the distribution of the estate, if the claim has not been paid, petition the probate court for leave to disallow the claim out of time. Upon hearing after notice to all interested parties, the probate court may in its discretion grant leave to disallow the claim out of time upon such terms as the court prescribes; and if the claim is disallowed within the time fixed by the court it has the same effect as if disallowed within the time prescribed by §

33-11-14

.

History of Section.

G.L., ch. 314, § 6, as enacted by P.L. 1910, ch. 583, § 1; P.L. 1915, ch. 1260, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 365, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 578, § 6; P.L. 1941, ch. 1003, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

33-11-15

; P.L. 2008, ch. 307, § 2.

33-11-16.
Probate court determination of disallowed claims against solvent estate.

If the estate is solvent, the personal representative, claimant or an interested party may request that the probate court determine the disallowed claim by petition filed within twenty (20) days of the disallowance. If no such request is timely made or if the probate court in its sole discretion finds that pleading, discovery and trial of the issues presented would be more efficiently presented in the district or superior court depending upon the amount in controversy, the disallowance shall be affirmed by order of the probate court and the claimant shall bring civil action on the disallowed claim pursuant to §

33-11-48

within thirty (30) days of the entry thereof or said claim shall be forever barred.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 888; G.L. 1909, ch. 314, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 365, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 578, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

33-11-16

; P.L. 1996, ch. 110, § 5; P.L. 2000, ch. 427, § 2; P.L. 2008, ch. 307, § 2.

33-11-17.
Repealed.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 889; G.L. 1909, ch. 314, § 9; G.L. 1923, ch. 365, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 578, § 9; P.L. 1996, ch. 110, § 5; P.L. 2000, ch. 427, § 2; Repealed by P.L. 2008, ch. 307, § 1, effective July 5, 2008.

33-11-18.
Repealed.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905 § 892; G.L. 1909, ch. 314, § 12; G.L. 1923, ch. 365, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 578, § 12; G.L. 1956 §

33-11-18

; P.L. 1996, ch. 110, § 5; Repealed by P.L. 2000, ch. 427, § 3, effective July 20, 2000.

33-11-19.
Payment of claims allowed or proved.

After the expiration of six (6) months and filing a statement of claims disallowed, if any there be, as provided in §

33-11-14

, the personal representative, shall proceed to pay the claims allowed or proved against the estate in the order of priority prescribed, after making provision for costs and expenses of administration, taxes, allowances, claims presented but pending determination or appeal and claims not barred that may yet be presented.

Claims thereafter presented and not disallowed, or disallowed and afterwards proved, shall be payable only out of assets remaining in the hands of the personal representative.

The personal representative may pay any just claim that has not been barred at any time, with or without formal presentation, but is personally liable to any other claimant whose claim is allowed and who is injured by its payment if: (1) payment was made within the claim period and the personal representative failed to require the payee to indemnify the estate for refund of any of the payment necessary to pay other claimants; or (2) payment was made, due to negligence or willful fault of the personal representative, in such manner as to deprive the injured claimant of priority.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 887; G.L. 1909, ch. 314, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 365, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 578, § 7; P.L. 1941, ch. 1003, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

33-11-19

; P.L. 2008, ch. 307, § 2.

33-11-20.
Application of later discovered assets — Extension of time for presenting claims.

If further assets are discovered and recovered by a personal representative after the expiration of six (6) months from the date of the first publication of notice of the qualification of the original personal representative, he or she shall apply the assets to the payment of the claims of creditors and account therefore in the same manner as assets received within six (6) months; and if the surplus of the assets remaining after payment of the claims in full is, in the opinion of the probate court, sufficient to warrant so doing, the probate court may order notice given of the receipt of the assets and may extend the time for presenting claims not to exceed six (6) months after notice. Claims presented within the extended time may be allowed or proved in the same manner as claims presented within six (6) months and shall be payable out of the assets remaining in the hands of the personal representative.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 975; G.L. 1909, ch. 318, § 10; G.L. 1923, ch. 369, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 579, § 10; P.L. 1941, ch. 1003, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

33-11-20

; P.L. 2008, ch. 307, § 2.

33-11-21.
Estate rendered insolvent by claims after allowance of account.

If a personal representative pays out, in accordance with law, the whole of the estate, he or she shall not be required, in consequence of the presentation of further claims, to represent the estate insolvent, but this payment, after allowance of his or her account, shall bar any action against him or her.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 894; G.L. 1909, ch. 314, § 14; G.L. 1923, ch. 365, § 14; G.L. 1938, ch. 578, § 14; G.L. 1956, §

33-11-21

; P.L. 2008, ch. 307, § 2.

33-11-22.
Estate rendered insolvent by late claims.

If a personal representative pays, under the provisions of §

33-11-19

, so much of the estate of the decedent that the remainder is insufficient to satisfy the claims presented after the expiration of the six (6) month period, and any of said late claims are disallowed, the personal representative may represent the estate insolvent, and shall, pursuant to decree of the probate court, divide and pay over the remaining estate among the creditors entitled to payment.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 895; G.L. 1909, ch. 314, § 15; G.L. 1923, ch. 365, § 15; G.L. 1938, ch. 578, § 15; G.L. 1956, §

33-11-22

; P.L. 2008, ch. 307, § 2.

33-11-23.
Disallowed claims against insolvent estates to be heard by probate court.

All claims against an insolvent estate which are disallowed shall be heard and decided by the probate court.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 898; G.L. 1909, ch. 314, § 18; G.L. 1923, ch. 365, § 18; G.L. 1938, ch. 578, § 18; G.L. 1956, §

33-11-23

; P.L. 1996, ch. 110, § 5; P.L. 2000, ch. 427, § 2.

33-11-24.
Hearings on insolvent estates.

A personal representative, at any time during administration, may represent the insolvent estate to the probate court, and apply for the probate court to examine and determine claims. If the probate court finds the estate is probably insolvent, it shall hear and determine all disallowed claims and the priority of payment among all presented claims.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 893; G.L. 1909, ch. 314, § 13; G.L. 1923, ch. 365, § 13; G.L. 1938, ch. 578, § 13; G.L. 1956, §

33-11-24

; P.L. 1996, ch. 110, § 5; P.L. 2000, ch. 427, § 2; P.L. 2008, ch. 307, § 2.

33-11-25 — 33-11-27.
Repealed.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905 §§ 889 — 901; G.L. 1909, ch. 314, §§ 19 — 21; G.L. 1923, ch. 365, §§ 19 — 21; G.L. 1938, ch. 578, §§ 19 — 21; G.L. 1956, §§

33-11-25

— 33-11-27; P.L. 1996, ch. 110, § 5); Repealed by P.L. 2000, ch. 427, § 3, effective July 20, 2000.

33-11-28.
Notice of hearings on insolvent estates.

In all insolvent estates, the probate court shall advertise notice of its hearings in one or more newspapers published in this state, as ordered by the court, at least once each week for two (2) successive weeks before the hearing. The court shall, by mail or otherwise, give to all creditors whose claims are disallowed at least seven (7) days’ written notice of the times and places of the hearings.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 902; G.L. 1909, ch. 314, § 22; G.L. 1923, ch. 365, § 22; G.L. 1938, ch. 578, § 22; G.L. 1956, §

33-11-28

; P.L. 1996, ch. 110, § 5; P.L. 2000, ch. 427, § 2.

33-11-29.
Statements of contested claims against insolvent estate.

At least fourteen (14) days before the first scheduled hearing date for claims in an insolvent estate as set forth in §

33-11-28

, the executor or administrator shall file in the office of the probate clerk a statement disallowing claims, not previously disallowed, as he or she intends to contest, and he or she shall from time to time, and as soon as may be, file a like statement with respect to any claim thereafter filed which he or she intends to contest.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 896; G.L. 1909, ch. 314, § 16; G.L. 1923, ch. 365, § 16; G.L. 1938, ch. 578, § 16; G.L. 1956, §

33-11-29

; P.L. 1996, ch. 110, § 5; P.L. 2000, ch. 427, § 2.

33-11-30.
Notice of disallowance by executor or administrator or objection by interested party.

When such disallowance is filed, the executor or administrator shall forthwith give written notice to the claimant, either personally or by registered or certified mail. When objection is filed by an interested person, the clerk shall forthwith give notice in like manner to the claimant.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 897; G.L. 1909, ch. 314, § 17; G.L. 1923, ch. 365, § 17; G.L. 1938, ch. 578, § 17; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3717, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

33-11-30

.

33-11-31.
Power of probate court over witnesses.

The probate court may compel the attendance of witnesses and administer oaths during hearings on claims in the same manner as other courts of record.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 903; G.L. 1909, ch. 314, § 23; G.L. 1923, ch. 365, § 23; G.L. 1938, ch. 578, § 23; G.L. 1956, §

33-11-31

; P.L. 1996, ch. 110, § 5; P.L. 2000, ch. 427, § 2.

33-11-32.
Secured claims against insolvent estates.

If a creditor, having a security for his or her claim against an insolvent estate upon any property of the estate, files his or her claim, the probate court shall inquire into the cash value of the security, and if the court allows the claim, the executor or administrator shall give the creditor personal notice of the amount allowed and the value of the security as reported by the court and unless the creditor shall, within fifteen (15) days after receiving notice, lodge with the court a certificate of his or her election to relinquish the security, he or she is entitled to a dividend from the estate upon the excess only of his or her claim above the amount of the court’s valuation of the security.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 907; G.L. 1909, ch. 314, § 27; G.L. 1923, ch. 365, § 27; G.L. 1938, ch. 578, § 27; G.L. 1956, §

33-11-32

; P.L. 1996, ch. 110, § 5; P.L. 2000, ch. 427, § 2.

33-11-33.
Repealed.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 904; G.L. 1909, ch. 314, § 24; G.L. 1923, ch. 365, § 24; G.L. 1938, ch. 578, § 24; P.L. 1996, ch. 110, § 5; P.L. 2000, ch. 427, § 2; Repealed by P.L. 2008, ch. 307, § 1, effective July 5, 2008.

33-11-34.
Interest on claims against insolvent estate.

In insolvent estate cases, the probate court shall allow interest to the death of the testator or intestate on claims drawing interest, and on claims not due at the death of the testator or intestate he or she shall ascertain their value as of the date of the death of the decedent.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 905; G.L. 1909, ch. 314, § 25; G.L. 1923, ch. 365, § 25; G.L. 1938, ch. 578, § 25; G.L. 1956, §

33-11-34

; P.L. 1996, ch. 110, § 5; P.L. 2000, ch. 427, § 2.

33-11-35.
Offset of mutual claims.

When there are mutual claims between the estate of the decedent and the claimant, which are subject to offset, the probate court, after reducing the claim to its present value, shall consider any mutual claims and allow the claimant only the balance justly due.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 906; G.L. 1909, ch. 314, § 26; G.L. 1923, ch. 365, § 26; G.L. 1938, ch. 578, § 26; G.L. 1956, §

33-11-35

; P.L. 1996, ch. 110, § 5; P.L. 2000, ch. 427, § 2; P.L. 2008, ch. 307, § 2.

33-11-36.
Repealed.

33-11-37.
Notice of disallowance by probate court.

If a claim against a solvent or insolvent estate is disallowed in whole or in part by the probate court, the probate clerk shall mail a written notice of the disallowance to the claimant or to his or her attorney within seven (7) days after the filing of the court’s order.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 908; G.L. 1909, ch. 314, § 28; G.L. 1923, ch. 365, § 28; G.L. 1938, ch. 578, § 28; G.L. 1956, §

33-11-37

; P.L. 1996, ch. 110, § 5; P.L. 2000, ch. 427, § 2.

33-11-38 — 33-11-41.
Repealed.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905 § 910 - 912, 914; G.L. 1909, ch. 314, § 30 - 32, 34; G.L. 1923, ch. 365, § 30 - 32, 34; G.L. 1938, ch. 578, § 30 - 32, 34; G.L. 1956, §

33-11-38

- 41; P.L. 1996, ch. 110, § 5; Repealed by P.L. 2000, ch. 427, § 3, effective July 20, 2000.

33-11-42.
Actions beyond probate court.

The exclusive remedy of any claimant whose claim is disallowed, in full or in part, by the probate court shall be a civil action on the disallowed claim in the district or superior court depending upon the amount in controversy pursuant to §

33-11-48

. The personal representative or other interested party may appeal the disallowance of any claim, in full or in part, for de novo determination in the superior court pursuant to §

33-23-1

et seq.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 915; G.L. 1909, ch. 314, § 35; G.L. 1923, ch. 365, § 35; G.L. 1938, ch. 578, § 35; G.L. 1956, §

33-11-42

; P.L. 1996, ch. 110, § 5; P.L. 2000, ch. 427, § 2; P.L. 2008, ch. 307, § 2.

Parties to Appeal.

Creditor could interpose the statute of limitations to the allowance of a claim, such defense being one which the executor or administrator could interpose. Mason v. Taft,

23 R.I. 388

, 50 A. 648,

1901 R.I. LEXIS 154

(1901).

33-11-43.
Superior court judgment — Costs.

The judgment of the superior court, on appeal, shall ascertain the claims and amounts to be added to, or deducted from, the claims, pursuant to the provisions of §

33-23-1

et seq. The costs of the appeal shall be awarded by the court against either party, or be divided between them, as justice may require, and execution for the costs shall issue accordingly.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 916; G.L. 1909, ch. 314, § 36; G.L. 1923, ch. 365, § 36; G.L. 1938, ch. 578, § 36; G.L. 1956, §

33-11-43

; P.L. 1996, ch. 110, § 5; P.L. 2000, ch. 427, § 2.

33-11-44.
Claims based on action commenced against decedent before death.

Any action or suit brought against a decedent in his or her lifetime, which survives, and in which the personal representative shall be notified to take upon itself the defense as provided in §

33-18-8

, and any action or suit, upon any cause of action originating in the lifetime of the decedent and which survives, brought against the personal representative before the estate has been represented insolvent, shall not abate, but may be prosecuted to final judgment against the estate. Those claims may be presented in the office of the probate clerk as provided in §§

33-11-4

and

33-11-5

, but need not be proved before the probate court, or the personal representative may be joined as a defendant with notice to the probate court and served in the pending action. Execution upon the judgment in the case shall be stayed. If the estate is, or shall be represented insolvent, the amount of the judgment shall be included in or added as a claim against the estate, subject to the provisions of §

33-11-32

, but shall not be subject to appeal; and if the estate is solvent, execution may issue at any time after claims of the same class are payable.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 917; G.L. 1909, ch. 314, § 37; G.L. 1923, ch. 365, § 37; G.L. 1938, ch. 578, § 37; G.L. 1956, §

33-11-44

; P.L. 1996, ch. 110, § 5; P.L. 2000, ch. 427, § 2; P.L. 2008, ch. 307, § 2.

33-11-45.
Claim barred by failure to prove or prosecute.

If a claimant shall not request probate court determination of its disallowed claim or bring civil action on its disallowed claim within the deadlines of this chapter, any action on said claim against the personal representative and estate of the decedent shall be forever barred. Affidavit of the personal representative or certificate of the district or superior court clerk that no civil action was brought by the claimant in the relevant time period shall be sufficient to establish failure to timely prosecute.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 918; G.L. 1909, ch. 314, § 38; G.L. 1923, ch. 365, § 38; G.L. 1938, ch. 578, § 38; G.L. 1956, §

33-11-45

; P.L. 1996, ch. 110, § 5; P.L. 2000, ch. 427, § 2; P.L. 2008, ch. 307, § 2.

33-11-46, 33-11-47.
Repealed.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, §§ 919, 921; G.L. 1909, ch. 314, §§ 39, 41; G.L. 1923, ch. 365, §§ 39, 41; G.L. 1938, ch. 578, §§ 39, 41; P.L. 1941, ch. 1003, § 5; P.L. 1996, ch. 110, § 5; P.L. 2000, ch. 427, § 2; Repealed by P.L. 2008, ch. 307, § 1, effective July 5, 2008.

33-11-48.
Action on disallowed claim.

Civil action on claims disallowed prior to the expiration of six (6) months from first publication may be brought in the district or superior court depending upon the amount in controversy no later than thirty (30) days after the expiration of six (6) months from first publication, and such civil action on claims disallowed after the expiration of six (6) months from first publication may be brought within thirty (30) days after notice is given to the claimant that the claim is disallowed or within thirty (30) days after said disallowance is affirmed by the probate court, whichever is later, unless the estate has been represented as insolvent. If, subsequent to the expiration of the period in which such civil action may be brought, the personal representative shall represent the estate as insolvent, a disallowed claim, on which suit is barred by the foregoing provision of this section, shall not be provable before the probate court.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 891; G.L. 1909, ch. 314, § 11; P.L. 1915, ch. 1260, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 365, § 11; G.L. 1938, ch. 578, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

33-11-48

; P.L. 1984, ch. 402, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 110, § 5; P.L. 2000, ch. 427, § 2; P.L. 2008, ch. 307, § 2.

Parties to Actions.

An administrator whose claim against the estate has been rejected by the commissioners cannot bring an action against himself and plead by way of justification that if he had waited for another administrator to be appointed the time limits prescribed by this section would have been exceeded. Perkins v. Se Ipsam,

11 R.I. 270

,

1875 R.I. LEXIS 38

(1875).

Devisees and residuary legatees could not maintain writ of error from judgment in favor of claimant consented to by executor on the ground that they had objected to allowance of claim, since there is no provision permitting them to be parties to a suit against the estate. Carney v. Superior Court,

30 R.I. 276

, 74 A. 1018,

1910 R.I. LEXIS 13

(1910).

This section and the general statute of limitations, §

9-1-21

, do not apply to actions that are pending prior to the death of a party. Hopp v. C.H.B. Dev. Corp., 669 A.2d 1152,

1996 R.I. LEXIS 4

(R.I. 1996).

33-11-49.
Actions barred within time for filing claims.

No personal representative shall be held to answer to a civil action, by a creditor of the decedent, which is commenced within six (6) months from the date of the first publication of the notice of the qualification of the first personal representative, unless the suit is brought under the provisions of §

9-1-21

, or other special provision made by statute.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 972; G.L. 1909, ch. 318, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 369, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 579, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

33-11-49

; P.L. 2008, ch. 307, § 2.

33-11-50.
Limitation of actions by creditors of decedent.

No personal representative shall be held to answer to the suit of a creditor of the decedent, except to a suit on the fiduciary’s bond, or as is otherwise provided, unless the suit is commenced within two (2) years from the date of the first publication and before any order of distribution has been made on the estate of the decedent.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 973; G.L. 1909, ch. 318, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 369, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 579, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

33-11-50

; P.L. 2008, ch. 307, § 2.

33-11-51.
Survival of child support obligations — Enforcement of claims — Child support public policy.

It is the public policy of the state of Rhode Island that dependent children shall be maintained and supported, as completely as possible, from the resources of their parents thereby relieving or avoiding, to the fullest extent, the burden borne by the citizens of the state.

In furtherance of said policy and not withstanding any conflicting statute or prior case law, it is declared that a parent’s legally enforceable obligation to pay child support, past and future:

Continues until the child’s eighteenth (18th) birthday or such later date or event set forth in the family court’s decree of child support;

Is not extinguished by but survives the parent’s death;

Is enforceable as a priority creditor’s claim from the deceased parent’s probate estate;

Is enforceable by imposition of a constructive trust over the deceased parent’s non-probate assets by equity petition in the superior court to the extent of any deficiency from the deceased parent’s probate estate;

Takes precedence over and must be satisfied prior to any distribution of the deceased parent’s probate assets by intestacy or by will; and

Cannot be nullified by disinheriting the child, however, a parent may exercise testamentary discretion and disinherit a child subject to the prior satisfaction of all his or her child support obligations, accrued and future.

The family court may modify child support obligations only for a substantial change in circumstances while the child is a minor and the parent with the obligation to support the child is alive. After said parent’s death, the probate or superior court, as the case may be, shall hear and determine the child’s claim and may award:

Delinquent and/or accrued child support to the date of the parent’s death, with interest therein at the statutory rate; and

Future or prospective child support until the child’s eighteenth (18th) birthday or such later date or event set forth in the family court’s decree of child support, offset by social security benefits payable to or for the child by reason of the parent’s death, and discounted to present value.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 298, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 314, § 1.